pt-PT: ferramentas compatíveis com tinta de desenho: Aerógrafo; Pincel; Caneta-pincel; Caneta de caligrafia; Caneta de imersão; Caneta de tinta permanente; Recarga de marcador; Técnica mista; Caneta técnica; Outro
vi: Dụng cụ tương thích với mực vẽ: Bút phun sơn; Cọ vẽ; Bút lông; Bút viết thư pháp; Bút chấm mực; Bút máy; Ống mực thay thế cho bút dạ; Phương tiện hỗn hợp; Bút vẽ kỹ thuật; Khác
ja: 描画インク対応ツール: エアブラシ; ブラシ; 筆ペン; カリグラフィーペン; つけペン; 万年筆; マーカーの補充; ミクストメディア; 製図用ペン; その他
sv: Redskap som är kompatibla med tusch: Airbrush; Pensel; Penselpenna; Kalligrafipenna; Dopp-penna; Reservoarpenna; Påfyllning för markeringspenna; Blandteknik; Teknisk ritpenna; Övrigt
cs: Kompatibilní nástroje pro kreslicí inkoust: Airbrush; Štětec; Štětcové pero; Kaligrafické pero; Namáčecí pero; Plnicí pero; Náplň do popisovače; Smíšená média; Technické pero; Jiné
pl: Narzędzia kompatybilne z tuszem rysunkowym: Aerograf; Pędzel; Pisak pędzelkowy; Pióro do kaligrafii; Obsadka ze stalówką; Pióro wieczne; Wkład do markera; Techniki mieszane; Cienkopis techniczny; Inne
es: Herramientas compatibles con la tinta de dibujo: Aerógrafo; Pincel; Rotulador pincel; Pluma de caligrafía; Pluma de inmersión; Pluma estilográfica; Recambio para marcador; Técnica mixta; Estilógrafo técnico; Otro
sl-SI: Orodja, združljiva s črnilom za risanje: Zračni čopič; Čopič; Pisalo s čopičem; Kaligrafsko pisalo; Pero za pomakanje; Nalivno pero; Polnilo za marker; Kombinirane tehnike; Tehnično pero; Drugo
ru: Инструменты, совместимые с чертежными чернилами: Аэрограф; Кисть; Брашпен; Каллиграфическая ручка; Перо для обмакивания; Перьевая ручка; Заправка для маркеров; Смешанные техники; Рапидограф; Другое
ko: 드로잉 잉크 호환 도구: 에어브러시; 브러시; 브러시 펜; 캘리그라피 펜; 딥 펜; 만년필; 마커 리필; 혼합 매체; 제도용 펜; 기타
ro-RO: Instrumente compatibile cu cerneala de desen: Aerograf; Pensulă; Stilou-pensulă; Stilou pentru caligrafie; Toc cu peniță; Stilou; Rezerve pentru marker; Tehnică mixtă; Stilou tehnic; Altele
pt-BR: Ferramentas compatíveis com tinta de desenho: Aerógrafo; Pincel; Caneta pincel; Caneta de caligrafia; Bico de pena; Caneta-tinteiro; Refil de marcador; Mídia mista; Caneta técnica; Outros
zh-CN: 绘图墨水适配工具: 喷枪; 画笔; 软笔; 书法笔; 蘸水笔; 钢笔; 马克笔替芯; 综合材料; 针管笔; 其他
el: Εργαλεία συμβατά με μελάνι σχεδίασης: Αερογράφος; Πινέλο; Στυλό-πινέλο; Στυλό καλλιγραφίας; Πένα με μελάνι; Πένα; Ανταλλακτικό μαρκαδόρου; Μεικτή τεχνική; Τεχνικό στυλό; Άλλο
en: Drawing ink compatible tools: Airbrush; Brush; Brush pen; Calligraphy pen; Dip pen; Fountain pen; Marker refill; Mixed media; Technical pen; Other
fi: Piirtomusteen kanssa yhteensopivat työkalut: Kynäruisku; Sivellin; Sivellinkynä; Kalligrafiakynä; Kastokynä; Mustekynä; Tussin täyttö; Sekatekniikka; Tekninen kynä; Muu
zh-TW: 繪圖墨水相容工具: 噴槍; 畫筆; 軟筆刷; 書法筆; 沾水筆; 鋼筆; 麥克筆補充墨水; 複合媒材; 針筆; 其他
it: Strumenti compatibili con l'inchiostro da disegno: Aerografo; Pennello; Penna a pennello; Penna per calligrafia; Pennino; Penna stilografica; Ricarica per pennarello; Tecniche miste; Penna a china; Altro
fr: Outils compatibles avec l’encre à dessin: Aérographe; Pinceau; Stylo-pinceau; Stylo de calligraphie; Porte-plume; Stylo-plume; Recharge pour marqueur; Techniques mixtes; Stylo technique; Autre
hu: Rajztinta-kompatibilis eszközök: Festékszóró; Ecset; Ecsetirón; Kalligráfiatoll; Mártótoll; Töltőtoll; Filctoll-utántöltő; Vegyes technika; Műszaki rajztoll; Egyéb
bg-BG: Инструменти, съвместими с туш за рисуване: Аерограф; Четка; Писалка тип четка; Калиграфска писалка; Писалка с перо; Писалка; Пълнител за маркер; Смесени материали; Техническа писалка; Друго
nl: Tekeninkt compatibele hulpmiddelen: Airbrush; Kwast; Brushpen; Kalligrafiepen; Kroontjespen; Vulpen; Markernavulling; Gemengde technieken; Technische pen; Overige
de: Mit Zeichentinte kompatible Werkzeuge: Airbrush; Pinsel; Pinselstift; Kalligrafie-Stift; Tauchfeder; Füllfederhalter; Marker-Nachfüllung; Mixed-Media; Tuschefüller; Sonstige
nb: Verktøy som er kompatible med tegneblekk: Airbrush; Pensel; Penselpenn; Kalligrafipenn; Dyppepenn; Fyllepenn; Tusjpåfylling; Blandede medier; Teknisk penn; Annet
th: อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้กับหมึกวาดภาพ: แอร์บรัช; พู่กัน; ปากกาพู่กัน; ปากกาคอแร้ง; ปากกาจุ่มหมึก; ปากกาหมึกซึม; หมึกเติมปากกามาร์กเกอร์; สื่อผสม; ปากกาเขียนแบบ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Nástroje kompatibilné s tušom na kreslenie: Airbrush; Štetec; Štetcové pero; Kaligrafické pero; Namáčacie pero; Plniace pero; Náplň do fixky; Kombinované médiá; Technické pero; Iné
lt-LT: Su piešimo rašalu suderinami įrankiai: Aerografas; Teptukas; Teptukinis rašiklis; Kaligrafinis rašiklis; Mirkoma plunksna; Plunksnakotis; Žymeklio papildymas; Mišri medija; Techninis rašiklis; Kita
hr-HR: Alati kompatibilni s tintom za crtanje: Zračni kist (airbrush); Kist; Kist-olovka; Pero za kaligrafiju; Pero za umakanje; Nalivpero; Punjenje za marker; Kombinirana tehnika; Tehničko pero (rapidograf); Ostalo
da: Værktøjer, der er kompatible med tegneblæk: Airbrush; Pensel; Penselpen; Kalligrafipen; Dyppepen; Fyldepen; Tuschrefill; Blandede medier; Teknisk pen; Andet
tr: Çizim mürekkebiyle uyumlu araçlar: Airbrush; Fırça; Fırça uçlu kalem; Kaligrafi kalemi; Divit kalem; Dolma kalem; Keçeli kalem yedeği; Karışık teknik; Teknik çizim kalemi; Diğer